it: Distanza tra le corde del pickup: Spaziatura F / Trembucker (Fender); Stretta; Standard (Gibson); Larga; Altro
da: Pickups strengafstand: F-spaced/Trembucker (Fender); Smal; Standard (Gibson); Bred; Andet
vi: Khoảng cách giữa các dây đàn: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Hẹp; Tiêu chuẩn (Gibson); Rộng; Khác
tr: Manyetik tel aralığı: F aralıklı / Trembucker (Fender); Dar; Standart (Gibson); Geniş; Diğer
cs: Rozteč strun snímače: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Úzké; Standardní (Gibson); Široké; Ostatní
ro-RO: Distanța dintre corzile chitarei: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Îngustă; Standard (Gibson); Lată; Altele
zh-TW: 拾音器琴弦間距: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); 窄版; 標準 (Gibson); 寬版; 其他
fi: Mikrofonin napaväli: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Kapea; Vakio (Gibson); Leveä; Muu
pt-BR: Captador espaçamento das cordas: Espaçamento F / Trembucker (Fender); Estreito; Padrão (Gibson); Largo; Outros
el: Διάστημα μεταξύ των χορδών του μαγνήτη: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Στενό; Τυπικό (Gibson); Φαρδύ; Άλλο
sv: Strängavstånd för pickup: F-spaced/Trembucker (Fender); Smal; Standard (Gibson); Bred; Övrigt
sl-SI: Razmik med strunami odjemnika zvoka: Razmik F/Trembucker (Fender); Ozek; Standardni (Gibson); Širok; Drugo
hu: Hangszedő húrtávolsága: F-távolságú / Trembucker (Fender); Keskeny; Standard (Gibson); Széles; Egyéb
en: Pickup string spacing: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Narrow; Standard (Gibson); Wide; Other
zh-CN: 拾音器弦距: F 间距 / Trembucker (Fender); 窄; 标准 (Gibson); 宽; 其他
nl: Pickup snaarafstand: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Smal; Standaard (Gibson); Breed; Overige
de: Saitenabstand des Tonabnehmers: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Schmal; Standard (Gibson); Breit; Andere
ko: 픽업 현 간격: F-스페이싱/트렘버커(펜더); 좁음; 스탠다드(깁슨); 넓음; 기타
lt-LT: Garso nuėmiklio stygų išdėstymas: „F-spaced“ / „Trembucker“ (Fender); Siauras; Standartinis (Gibson); Platus; Kita
fr: Espacement cordes/plots du micro: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Étroit; Standard (Gibson); Large; Autre
bg-BG: Разстояние между струните на адаптера: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Тесен; Стандартен (Gibson); Широк; Друг
pl: Rozstaw strun przetwornika: Rozstaw F / Trembucker (Fender); Wąski; Standardowy (Gibson); Szeroki; Inny
ja: 受取ストリング間隔: Fスペース / トレムバッカー (Fender); ナロー; スタンダード (Gibson); ワイド; その他
pt-PT: espaçamento da cadeia: Com espaçamento F/Trembucker (Fender); Estreito; Padrão (Gibson); Largo; Outro
nb: Strengeavstand på pickup: F-avstand / Trembucker (Fender); Smal; Standard (Gibson); Bred; Annet
es: Espaciamiento entre el micrófono y las cuerdas: Espaciado F/Trembucker (Fender); Estrecho; Estándar (Gibson); Ancho; Otro
sk-SK: Rozstup strún snímača: F-spacing / Trembucker (Fender); Úzke; Štandardné (Gibson); Široké; Iné
hr-HR: preuzimanje niz razmak: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Usko; Standardno (Gibson); Široko; Ostalo
th: การรับการเว้นระยะห่าง: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); แคบ; มาตรฐาน (Gibson); กว้าง; อื่นๆ
ru: Межструнное расстояние звукоснимателя: F-spaced / Trembucker (Fender); Узкое; Стандартное (Gibson); Широкое; Другое